District of Columbia statutes.
5-109.01

Cadet program authorized; purpose; preference for appointment; appropriations.

(a)

The Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department shall establish a police officer cadet program, which shall include senior year high school students and young adults under 21 years of age residing in the District of Columbia who are graduates of a high school in the District, for the purpose of instructing, training, and exposing interested persons to the operations of the Metropolitan Police Department and the duties, tasks, and responsibilities of serving as a police officer with the Metropolitan Police Department.

(b)

A person successfully completing the required training and service in a cadet program established pursuant to this section shall be accorded full preference for appointment as a member of the Metropolitan Police Department or of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, if the person shall have met all other requirements pertaining to membership in the chosen Department.

(c)

There may be appropriated the funds necessary for the administration of this section.

History

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-172, § 2(a), (c), (d), 29 DCR 5745
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 832, 47 DCR 6308
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313,§ 20(a), 48 DCR 1873
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 402(b), 51 DCR 9406

Cross References

Cadet training programs, police officers or firefighters, funding and administration, see § 38-912.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-109.02 and § 5-419.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-107.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-172 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read:
“The Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department may establish a police officer cadet program for the purpose of instructing, training, and exposing interested persons, primarily young adults residing in the District of Columbia, to the operations of the Metropolitan Police Department and the duties, tasks, and responsibilities of serving as a police officer with the Metropolitan Police Department.”
D.C. Law 13-313, in subsec. (a), substituted “21 years” for “the 21 years”.
D.C. Law 15-194, in subsec. (b), substituted “Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department” for “District of Columbia Fire Department”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 832 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).